Utah statutes.
17-16-5.5.   Reassignment of certain assessor duties to treasurer.

A county legislative body may by ordinance reassign to the treasurer the duties of the assessor under Sections 41-1a-1320, 59-2-407, 59-2-1302, 59-2-1303, and 59-2-1305.



Amended by Chapter 39, 2006 General Session

